Alaska, session 34, HB56.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in sec. 2 of this Act to the agencies named for the 03 purposes expressed for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 and ending June 30, 2025, 04 unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 30,000 30,000 11 Commission 12 Alaska Oil and Gas 30,000 13 Conservation Commission 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 Facility-Capital Improvement Unit 84,700 84,700 18 Facility-Capital 84,700 19 Improvement Unit 20 Administration and Support 86,100 86,100 21 Information Technology MIS 86,100 22 Population Management 3,547,400 11,047,400 -7,500,000 23 Institution Director's 3,352,400 24 Office 25 Anchorage Correctional 0 26 Complex 27 Regional and Community 195,000 28 Jails 29 Community Residential Centers 2,034,800 2,034,800 30 Community Residential 2,034,800 31 Centers 01 Electronic Monitoring 134,200 134,200 02 Electronic Monitoring 134,200 03 Health and Rehabilitation Services 2,767,500 2,767,500 04 Physical Health Care 2,721,700 05 Behavioral Health Care 45,800 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Education Support and Admin Services 42,400 42,400 10 Student and School 42,400 11 Achievement 12 Student Financial Aid Programs 975,000 975,000 13 Alaska Performance 650,000 14 Scholarship Awards 15 Alaska Education Grants 325,000 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 3,000,000 3,000,000 20 Alaska Psychiatric 3,000,000 21 Institute 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Subsistence Research & Monitoring 50,000 50,000 26 State Subsistence Research 50,000 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 Behavioral Health 3,100,000 3,100,000 31 Behavioral Health Treatment 3,100,000 01 and Recovery Grants 02 Public Assistance 5,000,000 5,000,000 03 Energy Assistance Program 5,000,000 04 Medicaid Services 228,599,000 14,200,000 214,399,000 05 Medicaid Services 228,599,000 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Commissioner and Administrative 518,500 518,500 10 Services 11 Workforce Investment Board 518,500 12 Alaska Vocational Technical Center 839,900 839,900 13 Alaska Vocational Technical 839,900 14 Center 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 Agriculture 3,200,000 3,200,000 19 Agricultural Development 3,200,000 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Taxation and Treasury 536,200 536,200 24 Alaska Retirement 512,900 25 Management Board 26 Permanent Fund Dividend 23,300 27 Division 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 620,400 620,400 01 Central Region Highways and 165,700 02 Aviation 03 Northern Region Highways 454,700 04 and Aviation 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 University of Alaska 133,327,500 -28,282,500 161,610,000 09 Budget Reductions/Additions 317,500 10 - Systemwide 11 Systemwide Services 15,520,000 12 Anchorage Campus 2,790,000 13 Fairbanks Campus 114,480,000 14 Juneau Campus 220,000 15 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 30,000 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 30,000 07 Department of Corrections 08 1002 Federal Receipts -7,500,000 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 16,154,700 10 *** Total Agency Funding *** 8,654,700 11 Department of Education and Early Development 12 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 42,400 13 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 975,000 14 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,017,400 15 Department of Family and Community Services 16 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 3,000,000 17 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,000,000 18 Department of Fish and Game 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 50,000 20 *** Total Agency Funding *** 50,000 21 Department of Health 22 1002 Federal Receipts 222,499,000 23 1003 General Fund Match 14,200,000 24 *** Total Agency Funding *** 236,699,000 25 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 26 1054 Employment Assistance and Training Program Account 660,000 27 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 698,400 28 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,358,400 29 Department of Natural Resources 30 1002 Federal Receipts 3,200,000 31 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,200,000 01 Department of Revenue 02 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 182,000 03 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 203,000 04 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 116,800 05 1042 Judicial Retirement System 11,100 06 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 23,300 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 536,200 08 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 09 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 620,400 10 *** Total Agency Funding *** 620,400 11 University of Alaska 12 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts -28,600,000 13 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 79,110,000 14 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 317,500 15 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 82,500,000 16 *** Total Agency Funding *** 133,327,500 17 Judiciary 18 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 10,586,300 19 1271 ARPA Revenue Replacement -10,586,300 20 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 388,493,600 21 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1003 General Fund Match 14,200,000 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 29,741,000 07 1271 ARPA Revenue Replacement -10,586,300 08 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 33,354,700 09 Designated General 10 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts -28,600,000 11 1054 Employment Assistance and Training Program Account 660,000 12 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 1,058,300 13 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 975,000 14 *** Total Designated General *** -25,906,700 15 Other Non-Duplicated 16 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 182,000 17 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 203,000 18 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 116,800 19 1042 Judicial Retirement System 11,100 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 79,160,000 21 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 620,400 22 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 80,293,300 23 Federal Receipts 24 1002 Federal Receipts 218,229,000 25 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 218,229,000 26 Other Duplicated 27 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 23,300 28 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 82,500,000 29 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 82,523,300 30 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for supplemental capital projects and grants from 02 the general fund or other funds as set out in section 5 of this Act by funding source to the 03 agencies named for the purposes expressed and lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise 04 noted. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Administrative Systems Updates (HD 1- 628,700 628,700 11 40) 12 Leased Warehouse Repairs and 100,000 100,000 13 Improvements (HD 1-40) 14 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 1,875,567 1,875,567 15 Commission Risk Based Data Management 16 System Upgrade Phase 1 (HD 1-40) 17 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 40,000,000 40,000,000 18 Commission Orphaned Well Performance 19 Grants (HD 1-40) 20 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 25,000,000 25,000,000 21 Commission Orphaned Well Formula 22 Grants (HD 1-40) 23 Blood Bank of Alaska - Blood Donor 500,000 500,000 24 Testing Laboratory (HD 9) 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans Affairs * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Flood Mitigation for Acquisition of 2,500,000 2,500,000 29 High Hazard Areas in the Matanuska- 30 Susitna Borough (HD 25-30) 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 National Recreational Trails Federal 600,000 600,000 04 Grant Program (HD 1-40) 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 Alaska Marine Highway System Vessel 6,500,000 6,500,000 09 Overhaul, Annual Certification and 10 Shoreside Facilities Rehabilitation 11 (HD 1-40) 12 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 65,000,000 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 500,000 07 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission Receipts 1,875,567 08 1219 Emerging Energy Technology Fund 728,700 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 68,104,267 10 Department of Military and Veterans Affairs 11 1002 Federal Receipts 2,500,000 12 *** Total Agency Funding *** 2,500,000 13 Department of Natural Resources 14 1002 Federal Receipts 600,000 15 *** Total Agency Funding *** 600,000 16 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 17 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 6,500,000 18 *** Total Agency Funding *** 6,500,000 19 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 77,704,267 20 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 7,000,000 06 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 7,000,000 07 Designated General 08 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission Receipts 1,875,567 09 *** Total Designated General *** 1,875,567 10 Federal Receipts 11 1002 Federal Receipts 68,100,000 12 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 68,100,000 13 Other Duplicated 14 1219 Emerging Energy Technology Fund 728,700 15 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 728,700 16 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. ALASKA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION. (a) Section 14(b), ch. 1, 02 SSSLA 2021, as amended by sec. 20, ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, and sec. 11(a), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is 03 amended to read: 04 (b) The amount of federal receipts received for the support of rental relief, 05 homeless programs, or other housing programs provided under federal stimulus 06 legislation, estimated to be $131,000,000 [$127,000,000], is appropriated to the 07 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for that purpose for the fiscal years ending 08 June 30, 2021, June 30, 2022, June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, 09 and June 30, 2026. 10 (b) Section 60(g), ch. 11, SLA 2022, as amended by sec. 11(b), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is 11 amended to read: 12 (g) Designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) received by the 13 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, estimated to be $40,000,000, for administration 14 of housing and energy programs on behalf of a municipality, tribal housing authority, 15 or other third party are appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for 16 the fiscal years ending June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, and 17 June 30, 2026. 18 * Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. The amount necessary to fund 19 corrective contributions to retirement accounts, not to exceed $2,679,460, is appropriated 20 from the general fund to the Department of Administration, division of retirement and 21 benefits, for that purpose for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026. 22 * Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 23 DEVELOPMENT. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the 24 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska seafood 25 marketing institute, for a comprehensive marketing plan for the fiscal years ending June 30, 26 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 27 * Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. (a) Section 60(d), ch. 1, SSSLA 2021, as 28 amended by secs. 23(b) and 67(x), ch. 11, SLA 2022, is amended to read: 29 (d) The sum of $40,000,000 is appropriated from federal receipts received 30 from sec. 9901, P.L. 117-2 (Subtitle M—Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery 31 Funds, American Rescue Plan Act of 2021) to the Department of Health [AND 01 SOCIAL SERVICES], division of public health, emergency programs, for responding 02 to public health matters arising from COVID-19 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 03 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 04 (b) Section 62(b), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, is amended to read: 05 (b) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2023, not to exceed 06 $750,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 1, ch. 11, SLA 2022, page 23, line 10, and 07 allocated on page 23, line 13 (Department of Health, departmental support services, 08 commissioner's office - $8,401,500), is reappropriated to the Department of Health, 09 departmental support services, commissioner's office, for homeless management 10 information systems for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, 11 and June 30, 2026, from the following sources: 12 (1) $375,000 from statutory designated program receipts; 13 (2) the remaining amount, not to exceed $375,000, from the general 14 fund. 15 (c) The sum of $5,954,328 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 16 Health, division of public assistance, for the purpose of addressing Supplemental Nutrition 17 Assistance Program new investment projects for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and 18 June 30, 2026. 19 * Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF LAW. (a) The sum of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the 20 general fund to the Department of Law, civil division, special litigation and appeals, for the 21 purpose of ongoing litigation brought by A Better Childhood, Inc., for the fiscal years ending 22 June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 23 (b) The sum of $2,756,227 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 24 Law, civil division, deputy attorney general's office, for the purpose of paying judgments and 25 settlements against the state for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. 26 (c) The amount necessary to pay the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program 27 penalty assessed for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, estimated to be $5,954,328, is 28 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Law, civil division, deputy attorney 29 general's office, for that purpose for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026. 30 (d) The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 31 Law, civil division, labor, business, and corporations, for costs related to labor contract 01 negotiations and arbitration support for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, 02 and June 30, 2027. 03 * Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS. Section 1, ch. 04 18, SLA 2014, page 55, lines 29 - 31, is amended to read: 05 APPROPRIATION GENERAL 06 ITEMS FUND 07 Fairbanks Veterans Cemetery - Planning, Design, 100,000 100,000 08 and Construction [GOLD RUSH HISTORIC 09 DITCH MITIGATION] (HD 1- 5) 10 * Sec. 13. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. The unexpended and unobligated balance on 11 June 30, 2025, of the Alaska capital income fund (AS 37.05.565) is appropriated to the Office 12 of the Governor for statewide critical deferred maintenance, renovation, and repair. 13 * Sec. 14. DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. Section 47(g), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is 14 amended to read: 15 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from 16 the specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 17 2025: 18 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 19 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, 20 estimated to be $0 [$2,229,468], from the amount received from the United States 21 Treasury as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Build 22 America Bond credit payments due on the series 2010A general obligation bonds; 23 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 24 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, after 25 the payment made in (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $0 [$6,754,939], from the 26 general fund for that purpose; 27 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 28 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 29 estimated to be $2,259,773, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 30 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 31 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general 01 obligation bonds; 02 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 03 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after 04 the payment made in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $2,403,900, from the 05 general fund for that purpose; 06 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 07 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, 08 estimated to be $434,570, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 09 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 10 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general 11 obligation bonds; 12 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 13 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after 14 the payments made in (5) of this subsection, estimated to be $460,839, from the 15 general fund for that purpose; 16 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 17 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2015B, 18 estimated to be $11,461,500 [$11,966,500], from the general fund for that purpose; 19 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 20 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016A, 21 estimated to be $9,358,000 [$10,381,125], from the general fund for that purpose; 22 (9) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 23 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016B, 24 estimated to be $9,579,375 [$10,304,125], from the general fund for that purpose; 25 (10) the sum of $511,245 from the investment earnings on the bond 26 proceeds deposited in the capital project funds for the series 2020A general obligation 27 bonds, for payment of debt service and accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska 28 general obligation bonds, series 2020A; 29 (11) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 30 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, after 31 the payment made in (10) of this subsection, estimated to be $6,526,505, from the 01 general fund for that purpose; 02 (12) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 03 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2023A, 04 estimated to be $18,384,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 05 (13) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and 06 accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 07 2024A, estimated to be $3,623,467, from the general fund for that purpose; 08 (14) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and 09 accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 10 2024B, estimated to be $1,912,228, from the general fund for that purpose; 11 (15) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding 12 State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, 2010B, 2013A, 2015B, 13 2016A, 2016B, 2020A, and 2023A, estimated to be $3,450, from the general fund for 14 that purpose; 15 (16) [(14)] the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing 16 payment to the United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax 17 penalties on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be 18 $50,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 19 (17) [(15)] if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are 20 temporarily insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with 21 these proceeds, the amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general 22 fund, contingent on repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general 23 obligation bond proceeds have been received by the state; and 24 (18) [(16)] if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and 25 accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the 26 amounts appropriated in this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the 27 obligations, from the general fund for that purpose. 28 * Sec. 15. FUND CAPITALIZATION. (a) The sum of $29,000,000 is appropriated from the 29 general fund to the disaster relief fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 30 (b) The sum of $13,141,700 is appropriated from the general fund to the fire 31 suppression fund (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities. 01 * Sec. 16. CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) If, after the appropriation 02 made in sec. 55, ch. 7, SLA 2024, the unrestricted state revenue available for appropriation in 03 fiscal year 2025 is insufficient to cover the general fund appropriations that take effect in 04 fiscal year 2025 that are made in this Act, as passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State 05 Legislature and enacted into law, and the general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal 06 year 2025 that are made in ch. 7, SLA 2024, ch. 8, SLA 2024, and ch. 9, SLA 2024, not 07 including the appropriations made in sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 2024, the amount necessary to 08 balance revenue and general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2025 that are 09 made in this Act, as passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature and enacted into 10 law, and the general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2025 that are made in 11 ch. 7, SLA 2024, ch. 8, SLA 2024, and ch. 9, SLA 2024, not including the appropriations 12 made in sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 2024, is appropriated to the general fund from the budget reserve 13 fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska). 14 (b) If, after the appropriation made in (a) of this section, the unrestricted state revenue 15 available for appropriation in fiscal year 2025 is insufficient to cover the general fund 16 appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2025, not including the appropriations made in 17 sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 2024, the amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund 18 appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2025, or to prevent a cash deficiency in the 19 general fund in fiscal year 2025, not including the appropriations made in sec. 56, ch. 7, SLA 20 2024, not to exceed $7,543,900, is appropriated to the general fund from the budget reserve 21 fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska). 22 (c) The appropriations made from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, 23 Constitution of the State of Alaska) in (a) and (b) of this section are made under art. IX, sec. 24 17(c), Constitution of the State of Alaska. 25 * Sec. 17. Section 1, ch. 8, SLA 2024, page 14, lines 5 - 7, is repealed. 26 * Sec. 18. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. (a) The appropriations made in secs. 4 - 6 and 27 13 of this Act are for capital projects and lapse under AS 37.25.020. 28 (b) The appropriations made in sec. 15 of this Act are for the capitalization of funds 29 and do not lapse. 30 * Sec. 19. RETROACTIVITY. (a) Sections 1 - 12, 14 - 18, and 20 of this Act are retroactive 31 to March 31, 2025. 01 (b) Section 13 of this Act is retroactive to June 30, 2025. 02 * Sec. 20. CONTINGENCY. The appropriation made in sec. 11(c) of this Act is contingent 03 on the Department of Health receiving, not later than June 30, 2025, written confirmation 04 from the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service that the 05 appropriation made in sec. 11(c) of this Act will satisfy the state's liability for the 06 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program penalty assessed for the fiscal year ending 07 June 30, 2024. 08 * Sec. 21. Section 13 of this Act takes effect June 30, 2025. 09 * Sec. 22. Except as provided in sec. 21 of this Act, this Act takes effect immediately under 10 AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.